Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 7

Deposits in Banks

45-2-701. Interest on accounts.

Banks shall be invested with the right and power to receive money on deposit, allowing therefor to the depositor, if the corporation chooses so to contract, interest at a rate not in excess of the maximum rate of interest authorized by the laws of the United States or by regulations issued under authority of these laws to be paid on deposits by member banks of the federal reserve system or by nonmember banks whose deposits are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation, whichever is lower.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.201); T.C.A., § 45-404.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 31, 41.

45-2-702. Deposit of minor.

A bank may operate a deposit account in the name of a minor or in the name of two (2) or more persons, one (1) or more of whom are minors, with the same effect upon its liability as if the minors were of full age.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.203); T.C.A., § 45-406.

45-2-703. Deposits in two or more names — Multiple-party deposit accounts.

When a deposit has been made or is hereafter made, in any bank, in the names of two (2) or more persons, payable to either, or survivor, the deposit, or any part of the deposit, or any interest or dividend on the deposit, may be paid to either person, whether the others are living or not; and the receipt or acquittance of the person so paid shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge to the bank for any payment so made. Any balance so created, including, but not limited to, any balance held by spouses, shall be subject to assignment by, or the claim of any creditor of, either depositor, as if the depositor were the sole owner of the funds; provided, that if the creditor realizes its claim by any means other than enforcement of an assignment, pledge, or the grant of a security interest made by any one (1) of the depositors, any other depositor not indebted to the creditor may, by commencing a separate action against the creditor, establish the rights that the depositor may have in the funds.

A bank paying a survivor in accordance with subsection (a) is not liable for any estate, inheritance or succession tax due this state.

As used in subsections (c)-(f), “multiple-party deposit account” means a deposit account, including a certificate of deposit, established in the names of, payable to, or in form subject to withdrawal by two (2) or more natural persons, or any of them, including, but not limited to, an account of the type described in subsection (a).

When opening a multiple-party deposit account, or amending an existing deposit account so as to create a multiple-party deposit account, each bank shall utilize account documents that enable the depositor to designate ownership interest therein in terms substantially similar to the following:

Joint tenants with right of survivorship;

Additional authorized signatory; and

Other deposit designations that may be acceptable to the bank.

Account documents that enable the depositor to indicate the depositor's intent of the ownership interest in any multiple-party deposit account may include any of the following:

The signature card;

The deposit agreement;

A certificate of deposit;

A document confirming purchase of a certificate of deposit; or

Other documents provided by the bank or deposit institution that indicate the intent of the depositor.

Accounts described in subsection (c) shall establish the following interests:

A designation of joint tenants with right of survivorship, or substantially similar language, shall be conclusive evidence in any action or proceeding of the intentions of all named that title vests in the survivor;

The designation of a person as an additional authorized signatory, or substantially similar language, shall be conclusive evidence in any action or proceeding that the person so designated has power of attorney with respect to the account and is not an owner of the account;

Other designations acceptable to the bank shall establish interests in accordance with their respective provisions;

In the absence of any specific designation in accordance with subsection (d), property held under the title, tenancy by the entireties, carries a right of survivorship; property held under the title, joint tenancy, carries no right of survivorship unless a contrary intention is expressly stated. Any other person to whose order the accounts or certificate of deposit is subject shall be presumed to have power of attorney with respect to the account or certificate of deposit and not to be an owner of the account or certificate of deposit. The presumptions may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence presented in the course of legal or equitable proceedings. Final judicial determinations contrary to the presumptions shall not affect a bank's earlier payment in accordance therewith, or the limitations on liability conferred by § 45-2-707(a) and (b); and

Absent a specific designation in the account documents referenced in subsection (d) that an account holds funds of a tenancy by the entirety, funds deposited into an account held by spouses in accordance with this section are not held by a tenancy by the entirety.

Without incurring any liability, any bank may, but shall not be required to, provide to depositors disclosures in form similar to the following:

Joint tenants with right of survivorship. This designation means that the deposit account or certificate of deposit shall become the property of each owner as joint tenants, and that the survivor is entitled to all moneys in the account or represented by the certificate even if the first person to die had a will specifically directing disposition to someone else. The bank may release all moneys in the account or represented by the certificate to, or honor checks or orders drawn by, or withdrawal requests from, the survivor upon the death of any joint tenant; and

Additional authorized signatory. This designation means that the person named as additional authorized signatory shall have authority during the lifetime of one (1) or more owners to withdraw moneys from the deposit account or represented by the certificate of deposit. Moneys remaining in the account or represented by the instrument upon the owner's death shall become part of the deceased owner's estate, subject to the deceased person's will or applicable law if the deceased person left no will. The bank may release all moneys in the account or represented by the certificate to, or honor checks or orders drawn by, or withdrawal requests from, the authorized signatory until notified of revocation of the authority.

Without incurring any liability, any bank may, but is not required to, remove a joint owner on a multiple-party deposit where two (2) or more persons are joint tenants with right of survivorship upon the written request of another person designated as a joint owner of the account.

Subsections (c)-(g) do not apply to any accounts in existence prior to January 1, 1989.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.204); T.C.A., § 45-407; Acts 1983, ch. 110, § 1; 1988, ch. 926, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 597, § 1; 2020, ch. 605, §§ 7, 8.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (e)(5); added (g); redesignated former (g) as present (h); and substituted “do not apply” for “shall not apply” in (h).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 605, § 10. March 20, 2020.

Cross-References. Applicability to savings and loan associations and savings banks, §45-2-106.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 439, 629.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 34, 39, 40; 8 Tenn. Juris., Cotenancy, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

TennCare: Expanded Estate Recovery - Recover at ALL Cost, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 711 (2015).

Where There's a Will: New Tennessee Trusts Map Route to Better Estate Planning for Married Clients, 50 Tenn. B.J. 28 (2014).

45-2-704. Deposits in trust — Contracts with bank for payable-on-death accounts — Living trusts.

Whenever any deposit is made in any bank by any person in trust for another, and no other or further notice of the existence and terms of a legal and valid trust is given in writing to the bank, the bank is entitled to deem the following with respect to the deposit, that:

The person designated as trustee is the owner of the deposit account;

The owner retains the right during the owner's lifetime to withdraw, assign or pledge the balance of the deposit account, in whole or in part, as though no survivor beneficiary had been named, and to delete or change a survivor beneficiary; and

The interest of a person designated as beneficiary shall not vest until the death of the owner, or in the case of joint owners, until the death of the last surviving owner, and the interest shall be subject to any lien, assignment, pledge, right of offset or other claim that the bank could have asserted against the owner.

No change in the designation of the survivor beneficiary is valid unless executed on a form and in a manner prescribed by the bank.

The following terms shall be deemed to apply to the account, unless the owner notifies the bank otherwise:

The interest of the beneficiary in the account vests, only if the beneficiary survives the last surviving owner;

Multiple beneficiaries surviving the last surviving owner shall be entitled to equal shares of the account; and

If no beneficiary survives, the account shall remain in the estate of the last surviving owner.

When a deposit account is so established, the account, or any part of the account, or any interest in the account, may be paid to any owner during the owner's lifetime. On the death of the last surviving owner, the deposit account, or any part of the account, or interest in the account, unless otherwise provided by notice to the bank and its acknowledgement, may be paid either:

To each designated beneficiary in equal shares; or

To all beneficiaries as tenants in common, the duty of any apportionment among beneficiaries devolving to the beneficiary or beneficiaries receiving payment; and the receipt or acquittance of the person or persons so paid shall be a sufficient release and discharge of the bank from liability to any person for payment.

In the event that any beneficiary, or any other person, contests any payment to a beneficiary, the bank may interplead the funds into a general sessions court, circuit court, or probate court with appropriate jurisdiction. A bank initiating, joining in, joined into, or defending in any manner, an interpleader action shall be entitled to recover from the funds tendered or offered to be tendered the costs of the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees.

In determining persons to be paid, or shares to be paid, if a bank chooses to pay more than one (1) beneficiary, a bank is entitled to presume the survival of an owner, or beneficiary, and no payment need be made to a beneficiary until the person's entitlement by right of survivorship is confirmed by official death certificate or other proof acceptable to the bank.

Any person, or persons jointly as tenants with right of survivorship, owning a deposit account may enter into a written contract with any bank whereby the balance of the deposit account may be made payable on the death of the last surviving owner to another person or persons, notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary.

In creating the account, “payable-on-death” or “payable on the death of” may be abbreviated to “P.O.D.”

The contract shall be deemed to contain a right on the part of an owner during the owner's lifetime both to withdraw, assign or pledge the balance of the deposit account, in whole or in part, as though no death payee had been named, and to delete or change a designated death payee.

The interest of a death payee shall be deemed not to vest until the death of the owner, or, in the case of joint owners until the death of the last surviving owner, and the interest shall be subject to any lien, assignment, pledge, right of offset or other claim that the bank could have asserted against the owner.

The following terms shall apply to the account, unless the contract provides otherwise:

The interest of a death payee in the account vests only if the payee survives the last surviving owner;

Multiple death payees surviving the last surviving owner shall be entitled to equal shares of the account; and

If no death payees survives, the account shall remain in the estate of the last surviving owner.

No change in the designation of a death payee shall be valid unless executed on a form and in a manner prescribed by the bank and authorized by all account owners living at the time of the change.

When a deposit account is so established, the account, or any part of the account or any interest in the account, may be paid to any owner during the owner's lifetime. On the death of the last surviving owner, the deposit account, or any part of the account or any interest in the account, unless otherwise provided in the contract, may be paid either:

To each designated death payee in equal shares; or

To all death payees as tenants in common, the duty of any apportionment among death payees devolving to the death payee or payees receiving payment;(B) The receipt or acquittance of the person or persons paid shall be a sufficient release and discharge of the bank from liability to any person for payment.

In the event that any death payee or any other person contests any payment to a death payee, the bank may interplead the funds into a general sessions court, circuit court, or probate court with appropriate jurisdiction. A bank initiating an interpleader action shall be entitled to recover from the funds tendered the costs of the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees.

In determining persons to be paid, or shares to be paid, if a bank contracts or chooses to pay more than one (1) death payee, a bank is entitled to presume the survival of an owner, or death payee, and no payment need be made to a death payee until the person's entitlement by right of survivorship is confirmed by official death certificate or other proof acceptable to the bank.

No bank so paying the survivor or death payee shall be liable for any estate, inheritance or succession taxes due this state.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other law to the contrary, nothing contained within this section shall be construed to prevent a living trust from being designated as a beneficiary of a payable-on-death account.

Prior to accepting the designation of a living trust as beneficiary, a bank may require the account owner to deliver a copy of:

Certificate or affidavit of trust:

In the form and containing the information required by the bank;

Signed by the grantor, trustee or both; and

Notarized; or

Other documents establishing the trust as may be acceptable to the bank.

A bank may rely on the continuance of the trust and the information provided in the certificate, affidavit or other documentation, until the bank receives actual notice of any amendment, revocation or change, including, but not limited to, appointment of a co-trustee or successor trustee, or removal of a trustee. Actual notice shall not be effective until delivery of documentation acceptable to the bank to support the amendment, revocation or change.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.205); T.C.A., § 45-408; Acts 1983, ch. 110, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 51, § 1; 1993, ch. 39, §§ 1-5, 7-9; 1994, ch. 655, § 1; 2017, ch. 264, § 5.

Cross-References. “Payable-on-death” share accounts and share deposits in trust held by credit unions, §45-4-406.

Applicability to savings and loan associations and savings banks, §45-2-106.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-2-705. Final adjustment of statements of account.

When a statement of account has been rendered by a bank to a depositor or has been mailed to the depositor's last known address, showing the condition of the depositor's account, the account shall, after the period of six (6) years from the date of the rendition of the statement, in the event no objection to the statement in writing has been theretofore made by the depositor or suit brought to correct same, be deemed finally adjusted and settled and its correctness conclusively presumed, and the depositor shall thereafter be barred from questioning the account for any cause. Banks shall accordingly not be required to preserve or keep their records or files relating thereto for a longer period than six (6) years.

Nothing herein shall be construed to relieve the depositor from the duty now imposed by law of exercising due diligence in the examination of the account and vouchers, if any, accompanying the statement, when rendered by the bank and of immediate notification to the bank upon discovery of any error therein, nor from the legal consequences of neglect of that duty.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.206); T.C.A., § 45-409.

45-2-706. Adverse claim to bank deposit.

Notice to any bank of an adverse claim to a deposit standing on its books to the credit of any person shall not be effectual to cause the bank to recognize the adverse claimant unless the adverse claimant shall procure a restraining order, injunction or other appropriate process against the bank from a court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.207); T.C.A., § 45-410.

Cross-References. Applicability to savings and loan associations and savings banks, §45-2-106.

45-2-707. Powers of attorney.

A bank, which for the purposes of this section also includes a lessor, as defined in § 45-2-901, may recognize the authority of a power of attorney authorizing in writing an attorney-in-fact to operate, in whole or in part, the account of a depositor, or to access a customer's safe deposit box, until the bank receives written notice of the revocation of this authority.

Written notice of the death or adjudication of incompetency of the depositor or customer shall constitute written notice of revocation of the authority of the attorney-in-fact, except where the Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act, compiled in title 34, chapter 6, part 1, is applicable. Until the bank receives written notice of adjudication of incompetency of the depositor, the bank's authority to recognize a power of attorney shall not be rendered ineffective by the incompetency, whether existing at the time the power of attorney is granted or at the time the bank acts upon it.

Notwithstanding that a bank has received written notice of revocation of the authority of the attorney-in-fact, it may, until ten (10) days after receipt of notice, pay any item made, drawn, accepted or endorsed by the attorney-in-fact prior to the revocation; provided, that the item is otherwise properly payable.

No bank shall be liable for damages, penalty or tax by reason of any payment made or property withdrawn pursuant to this section.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.208); T.C.A., § 45-411; Acts 1983, ch. 299, § 9; 1988, ch. 926, § 3.

Cross-References. “Payable-on-death” share accounts and share deposits in trust held by credit unions, §45-4-406.

Applicability to savings and loan associations and savings banks, §45-2-106.

Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act, title 34, ch. 6.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-2-708. Payment when no executor or administrator qualifies.

Notwithstanding § 30-2-317, where no executor or administrator of a deceased depositor has qualified and given notice of the person's qualifications to the bank, the bank may, in its discretion, and at any time after thirty (30) days from the death of the depositor, pay out of all accounts, maintained with it by the depositor in an individual capacity, all sums that do not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in the aggregate:

To the executor named in any will known to the bank; or

In the absence of knowledge of a purported will naming a surviving executor to:

A creditor for expenses of the funeral;

A creditor for the expenses of the last illness;

The surviving spouse; and

The next of kin.

In the case of conflicting claims, the order of priority shall be that set out in subdivision (a)(1)(B).

The receipt of any guardian, administrator or executor, duly appointed or qualified by the courts of this state, or any other state, acknowledging the payment or transfer of funds, standing in the name of the person whose estate the fiduciary represents, in the form of deposits in banking institutions, shall be a good and sufficient acquittance for payment or transfer and shall constitute a valid defense in favor of the banks against the demands or claims of all parties.

No bank shall be liable for damages, penalty or tax by reason of any payment made pursuant to this section.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.209); T.C.A., § 45-412; Acts 1980, ch. 615, § 1; 1988, ch. 926, § 4; 1991, ch. 136, § 1; 1995, ch. 103, § 1; 1997, ch. 426, § 22; 2000, ch. 570, § 1; 2016, ch. 804, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 103, § 2 provided that the amendment by that act applies to all estates where the decedent has died after July 1, 1995.

Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendments to this section by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998 and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Robinson and Mobley), § 1133.

Law Reviews.

Joint Bank Accounts Jus Accrescendi in Tennessee, 7 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 332.

45-2-709. Reserve against deposits.

A state bank shall maintain a reserve against deposits in the form and manner that the commissioner prescribes by regulation. In promulgating regulations hereunder, the commissioner shall consider the reserve requirements of the federal Monetary Control Act of 1980, 94 Stat. 132, and the liquidity needs of state banks.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.249); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-427; Acts 1981, ch. 226, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Monetary Control Act of 1980, referred to in this section, is compiled as 12 U.S.C. §§ 248, 248a, 342, 347b, 355, 360, 412, 461, 463, 505, 1425a (repealed).

45-2-710. Statute of limitations.

An action to enforce the obligation of a bank to pay all or part of the balance of a deposit account or certificate of deposit, collectively a deposit, must be commenced within six (6) years of the earlier of the following:

The time that the six-year statute of limitations period begins to run under § 47-3-118(e)(1), if the deposit is a certificate of deposit subject to title 47, chapter 3; or

The later of:

The maturity date of the deposit, as set forth in the applicable original contract of deposit;

The due date of the deposit indicated in the bank's last written notice of renewal sent pursuant to § 45-2-618;

The date of the last written communication from the bank recognizing the bank's obligation with respect to the deposit; or

The last day of the taxable year for which the owner of the deposit last reported interest income earned on the deposit on either a federal or state income tax return.

Acts 2005, ch. 30, § 1.

45-2-711. Payment and negotiation of check when no estate has been opened or the estate has been closed.

Notwithstanding § 30-2-317, where no executor or administrator of a decedent has qualified and given notice of the person's qualifications to the bank, or where the qualified executor or administrator of a decedent has been discharged and a check or checks made payable to the decedent or the decedent's estate is presented to the bank for payment or collection, the bank may, in its discretion, and at any time after ninety (90) days from the death of the deceased, negotiate or send for collection and pay out the proceeds of one (1) or more checks made payable to the decedent or the decedent's estate, whether written or electronic, all sums that do not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in the aggregate:

To the executor named in any will known to the bank whether probated or not;

To any personal representative appointed by a court whether active or discharged; or

In the absence of knowledge of a purported will naming a surviving executor or an administrator to the:

Surviving spouse; or

Next of kin.

In the case of conflicting claims, the order of priority shall be that set out in subdivision (a)(1).

The receipt of any guardian, administrator or executor, duly appointed or qualified by the courts of this state, or any other state, or of any spouse or next of kin acknowledging the negotiation, payment or transfer of funds of a check, standing in the name of the person whose estate the fiduciary represents, shall be a good and sufficient acquittance for payment or transfer and shall constitute a valid defense in favor of the bank against the demands or claims of all parties.

The negotiation or payment of a check under this section without an endorsement of the payee or with the endorsement of a person authorized by this section to negotiate the check shall not be a violation of or give rise to any claim under title 47, chapter 3 or 4.

No bank shall be liable for damages, penalty or tax by reason of any payment made pursuant to this section.

Acts 2014, ch. 597, § 2; 2016, ch. 804, §§ 3-5.

45-2-712. Acknowledgement or affidavit — Guarantee.

A bank shall require any persons seeking to cash checks payable to a decedent as provided in § 45-2-711 to deliver to the bank an affidavit, given under the penalty of perjury, in a form acceptable to the bank that, at the minimum, contains the following:

The name of the decedent;

The decedent's date of death;

The amount and payor of any checks, if the funds are from checks or electronic payments;

The identity of the creditor or creditors to whom the funds are to be paid, if the funds are to be paid directly to a creditor of the decedent or the decedent's estate; and

If the funds are to be paid other than to a creditor of the decedent or the decedent's estate, the affiant shall:

Identify the decedent's surviving spouse and heirs at law, and provide their residence addresses; and

Affirmatively state that:

There are no unpaid creditors of the decedent;

There are no unpaid income, gift, estate, inheritance or other transfer taxes owed by the decedent or the estate of the decedent; and

The funds distributed to the affiant will be distributed by the affiant as provided in any will or testamentary document or in appropriate shares to the decedent's heirs at law.

A bank may, in its discretion, require any persons seeking to collect monies from a deceased depositor's account or accounts, as provided in § 45-2-708, to deliver to the bank an affidavit, given under penalty of perjury in a form acceptable to the bank as provided in subsection (a).

A bank may require any person who obtains funds from a deposit account pursuant to § 45-2-708 or to negotiate checks pursuant to § 45-2-711 to provide an indemnity and guarantee to the bank in the amount of the funds obtained.

Acts 2014, ch. 597, § 2.